Massachusetts, session 194th, H3701.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting in Section 15 the following subsections:-
(f) Any lienholder in possession of a motor vehicle title shall provide the title to the
purchaser or lessee of the vehicle within 7 days of full payment of the vehicle’s purchase price,
lease buyout, or financing agreement.
(g) Failure to comply with this requirement shall result in a penalty of $500 per day of
non-compliance, to be assessed by the Registry of Motor Vehicles.
(h) The Registry of Motor Vehicles shall promulgate regulations to ensure compliance
with this section.
of 1